Tennessee, session 114, SB2616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-3304(c), is amended by
deleting "sixty (60) days" and substituting "sixty-five (65) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2616
012031
- 1 -